Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.110.040

Compliance—Community colleges.

The executive director of the student achievement council, in consultation with the council of presidents and the state board for community and technical colleges, shall monitor the compliance by institutions of higher education with this chapter.

(1) The council shall establish a timetable and guidelines for compliance with this chapter.

(2) By November 30, 1990, each institution shall submit to the council for approval a plan to comply with the requirements of RCW 28B.110.030. The plan shall contain measures to ensure institutional compliance with the provisions of this chapter by September 30, 1994. If participation in activities, such as intercollegiate athletics and matriculation in academic programs is not proportionate to the percentages of male and female enrollment, the plan should outline efforts to identify barriers to equal participation and to encourage gender equity in all aspects of college and university life.

(3) The council may delegate to the state board for community and technical colleges any or all responsibility for community college compliance with the provisions of this chapter.

[ 2012 c 229 s 567; 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 203; 1997 c 5 s 5; 1989 c 341 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Effective date—1997 c 5: See note following RCW 28B.15.455.